src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Lule Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! ===========================
!! # Sublexica for Adjective
! ===========================

!! ## Even-syllable stems
! -------------------


! With CG 

LEXICON GIEVRRA !!= @CODE@ Adjectives with attribute in WeG and -s. As 1a in Spiik. Sg Acc: gievrav, Attr: gievras.

                    :%>Q1s ATTR              ;
                    :%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                    :%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                    :%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
                    :%>Q1  BU/MUS            ;
  +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>Q1t K-CONS            ;
                    :%>    MUORRACmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: gárttje # Even-syllable test
!!€ gárttje:             gárttje+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gártjev:             gárttje+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gártjes:             gárttje+A+Attr
!!€ gártjep:             gárttje+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 



LEXICON NUORRA !!= @CODE@  Adjectives with attribute same as pred. As 1b in Spiik. Sg Acc: nuorav, Attr: nuorra.
                    :%>    ATTR                ;
                    :%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEMadj ;
                    :%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj   ; ! cg in nominal paradigm
                    :%>Q1  BU/MUS              ;
  +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>Q1t K-CONS              ; ! Presumably WeG as adverb as well
                    :%>    MUORRACmp           ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: visská # Even-syllable test
!!€ visská:             visská+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ viskáv:             visská+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ visská:             visská+A+Attr
!!€ viskáp:             visská+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 



LEXICON GALLJE !!= @CODE@  Adjectives on -e, the attribute is in WeG and e > a. As 1d in Spiik. Sg Acc: galjev, Attr: galja.
                 :a%>Q1  ATTR              ; ! a-attr.
!     :es%>Q1 ATTR ; ! e-attr. !These now hardcoded
! :a%>Q1 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
! :es%>Q1 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 :e%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ; ! presumably normal adjective
                 :e%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 :e%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; ! behaviour, with cg, and with
                 :e%>Q1  BU/MUS            ; ! the e-form as a starting +A 
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:e%>Q1t K-CONS            ; ! point.
                 :e%>    MUORRACmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: uhttse # Even-syllable test
!!€ uhttse:             uhttse+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ uhtsev:             uhttse+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ uhtsa:              uhttse+A+Attr
!!€ uhtses:             uhttse+A+Attr # gets this attr from 
!!€ uhtsep:             uhttse+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON TJÁBBE !!= @CODE@  Adjectives on -e, the attribute is in WeG and e > a. Same as GALLJE only different adv derivation. Sg Acc: tjáppev, Attr: tjáppa.
                 :a%>Q1 ATTR              ; ! a-attr.
!     :es%>Q1 ATTR ; ! e-attr. !These now hardcoded
! :a%>Q1 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
! :es%>Q1 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 :e%>   NE-EVENCASEadj    ; ! presumably normal adjective
                 :e%>X4 ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 :e%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; ! behaviour, with cg, and with
                 :e%>Q1 BU/MUS            ; ! the e-form as a starting
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:á%>t  K-CONS            ; ! point.
                 :e%>   MUORRACmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: njálgge # Even-syllable test
!!€ njálgge:             njálgge+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ njálgev:             njálgge+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ njálga:              njálgge+A+Attr
!!€ njálgep:             njálgge+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 




! Without CG 

LEXICON VILLDA !!= @CODE@  Adjectives with attribute same as pred, without CG. As 1b in Spiik. Sg Acc: nuorav, Attr: nuorra.
                    :%>    ATTR                ;
                    :%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEMadj ;
                    :%>Q4  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj   ; ! 
                    :%>Q4  BU/MUS              ;
  +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>Q4t K-CONS              ; ! 
                    :%>    MUORRACmp           ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: frisska # Even-syllable test
!!€ frisska:              frisska+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ frisskav:             frisska+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ frisska:              frisska+A+Attr
!!€ frisskap:             frisska+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON HÁVSSKE !!= @CODE@  Adjectives with attribute -s, without WeG. As 1c in Spiik. Sg Acc: hávsskev, Attr: hávsskes.
                    :%>s     ATTR              ;
                    :%>      NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                    :%>X4    ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                    :%>Q4    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; ! 
                    :%>Q4    BU/MUS            ;
  +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>Q4t   K-CONS            ;
                    :%>      MUORRACmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: hoallá # Even-syllable test
!!€ hoallá:              hoallá+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ hoalláv:             hoallá+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ hoallás:             hoallá+A+Attr
!!€ hoalláp:             hoallá+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON TJUODDJE !!= @CODE@ Adjectives with attribute -is, without WeG. presently only "Tjuoddje" Sg Acc: tjuoddjev, Attr: tjuoddjis.
                   :i%>s   ATTR              ;
                   :e%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                   :e%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                   :e%>Q4  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; ! Presumably WeG in nominal paradigm
                   :e%>Q4  BU/MUS            ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:e%>Q4t K-CONS            ;
                   :e%>    MUORRACmp         ;


! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: tjuoddje # Even-syllable test
!!€ tjuoddje:              tjuoddje+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ tjuoddjev:             tjuoddje+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ tjuoddjis:             tjuoddje+A+Attr
!!€ tjuoddjep:             tjuoddje+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 



!!
!! Pres.participles 
!!

LEXICON SÁVADAHTTE  !!= @CODE@ Causative-participles. No attribute. No comparision. As 1e in Spiik. Sg Acc: sávadahttev. PrsPrc of causative verbs "uttrykker at handlingen lar seg gjøre eller er verdt å gjøre" (Kintel 1991).
 :%>   NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
 :%>X4 ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
 :%>Q4 N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
 :%>   MUORRACmp         ;
 :%>  ATTR_PrsPrc        ;
 
! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: vuojedahtte # Even-syllable test
!!€ vuojedahtte:             vuojedahtte+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ vuojedahttev:            vuojedahtte+A+Sg+Acc

LEXICON JUHKKE  !!= @CODE@ participles with -s attributive. No comparision As 1e in Spiik. Sg Acc: juhkkev, Attr: juhkkes. Spiik: presens particip har med den attributive formen på -s betydelsen "någon som är duktig i, snabb til att, begiven att utföra handlingen".
      :%>s  ATTR_PrsPrc       ;
      :%>   NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
      :%>X4 ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
      :%>Q4 N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
      :%>   MUORRACmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: vuohttje # Even-syllable test
!!€ vuohttje:              vuohttje+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ vuohttjev:             vuohttje+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ vuohttjes:             vuohttje+A+Attr
