src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
addne+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:addne JUHKKE ;
anedahtte+A:anedahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
arealaddne+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:are^al#addne JUHKKE ;
arealaddne+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:are^ál#addne JUHKKE ;
baldedahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:baldedahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
balldalahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:balldalahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
baládahtte+A:baládahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
basske+A:bassk GALLJE ;
binná+A:binná VILLDA ;
buogŋe+A:buogŋe GIEVRRA ;
buorre+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buorre NUORRA ;
bårådahtte+A:bårådahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
dajdda+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dajdda GIEVRRA ;
diertjestahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diertjestahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
duhtadahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duhtadahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
duohta+A:duohta NUORRA ;
dájgge+A:dájgge GIEVRRA ;
dáktá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dáktá HÁVSSKE ;
dåhkkidahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dåhkkidahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
dæŋŋgo+A:dæŋŋgo NUORRA ;
friddja+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:friddja VILLDA ;
frisska+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:frisska VILLDA ;
gallje+A:gallj GALLJE ;
giehtatjiehppe+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giehta#tjiehppe GIEVRRA ;
gilggá+A:gilggá HÁVSSKE ;
goansstá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goansstá HÁVSSKE ;
grehka+A:grehka NUORRA ;
guhkke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guhkk GALLJE ;
guollevallje+A:guolle#vallje GIEVRRA ;
guollá+A:guolºlá HÁVSSKE ;
guovggisruodná+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guovggis#ruodná NUORRA ;
gæmmpa+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gæmmpa GIEVRRA ;
heva+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:heva NUORRA ;
hielle+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hielºle HÁVSSKE ;
hiemssidahtte+A:hiemssidahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
hoavkke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:hoavkke GIEVRRA ;
hávsske+A+Err/Orth:hávslke HÁVSSKE ;
hådje+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hådje GIEVRRA ;
hærvvá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hærvvá HÁVSSKE ;
hæsso+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hæsso GIEVRRA ;
issjá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:issjá HÁVSSKE ;
jerudahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jerudahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
juhkke+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:juhkke JUHKKE ;
juovvá+A:juovºvá HÁVSSKE ;
jáhkedahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jáhkedahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
jállo+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jállo GIEVRRA ;
kråvvå+A:kråvvå NUORRA ;
lahtte+A:lahtte NUORRA ;
lievhnos+A:lievhnos GIEVRRA ;
loadtje+A:loadtje GIEVRRA ;
lájtedahtte+A:lájtedahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
lådje+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lådje GIEVRRA ;
manádahtte+A:manádahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
moarrá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moarºrá HÁVSSKE ;
niddo% buorre+A+CmpNP/None:niddo% buorre NUORRA ;
nirvvá+v2+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snirvvá HÁVSSKE ;
njoahtse+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njoahtse GIEVRRA ;
njálgge+A:njálgg TJÁBBE ;
nuojbba+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nuojbba GIEVRRA ;
nuorra+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:nuorra NUORRA ;
oahttjá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oahttjá HÁVSSKE ;
oalggá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oalggá HÁVSSKE ;
rassje+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rassje GIEVRRA ;
riegádahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:riegádahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
riekta+A:riekta NUORRA ;
rissjavisská+A:rissja#visská NUORRA ;
risska+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:risska VILLDA ;
ruodná+A:ruodná NUORRA ;
ruoppsisruodná+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruoppsis#ruodná NUORRA ;
saddjá+A:saddjá HÁVSSKE ;
siellde+A:siellde NUORRA ;
sjmilltjá+A:sjmilltjá GIEVRRA ;
skiermmá+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skiermmá NUORRA ;
skuovllá+A:skuovllá HÁVSSKE ;
slievvo+A:slievvo GIEVRRA ;
snivva+A:snivva NUORRA ;
snávgge+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snávgge GIEVRRA ;
stuorre+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuorr TJÁBBE ;
suojggá+A:suojggá HÁVSSKE ;
suoldodahtte+A:suoldodahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
sávadahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sávadahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
tjoajvvá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjoajvvá HÁVSSKE ;
tjuoddje+A:tjuoddj TJUODDJE ;
tjuorbbe+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuorbbe GIEVRRA ;
tjuovggisruodná+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuovggis#ruodná NUORRA ;
tjábbe+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjább TJÁBBE ;
tjábbe+A+Err/Orth:tjabb TJÁBBE ;
tjáhppislahtte+A:tjáhppis#lahtte NUORRA ;
tsuhttá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tsuhttá HÁVSSKE ;
uhttse+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:uhtts GALLJE ;
unne+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:unºn GALLJE ;
vahágahtte+A:vahágahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
viejtto+A:viejtto NUORRA ;
viessomguhkke+A:viessom#guhkk GALLJE ;
villda+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:villda VILLDA ;
vuohttje+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuohttje JUHKKE ;
vuordedahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuordedahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
vuorvve+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuorvve GIEVRRA ;
vuovnná+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuovnná HÁVSSKE ;
vælggodahtte+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vælggodahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
ådå+A:ådå VILLDA ;
ådå+A+Err/Orth:åda VILLDA ;
årodahtte+A:årodahtte SÁVADAHTTE ;
smalldá+A:smalldá HÁVSSKE ; ! en som ikke snakker rent/lesper. s 490 Grundstøm. dagu gærggá, adjektijva suorgudibme?
